Maine, session 132, LD1096.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §9211-A, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. Purpose of the fund; repayment of existing debt. In addition to grants and
grant match funding provided in accordance with subsections 3 and 3-A, the fund may be
used to provide funding to a municipal entity applying for project grants to repay debt that
was incurred by the municipal entity for the construction of a gigabit fiber-optic broadband
network owned by the municipal entity. For purposes of this subsection, "municipal entity"
means a municipality or a group of municipalities working together to support a gigabit
fiber-optic broadband network project.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §9402, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Municipal entity. "Municipal entity" means a municipality or a group of
municipalities working together to support a broadband network project.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §9405, sub-§11-A is enacted to read:
11-A. Loans or grants to repay debt. To make alone or in participation or
cooperation with others direct loans or grants, as allowed by law, to a municipal entity for
the repayment of debt incurred by the municipal entity for the construction of broadband
infrastructure owned by the municipal entity;
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §9405-A is enacted to read:
§9405-A. Municipally owned broadband infrastructure; duty of authority
In administering a grant or award for the development or construction of broadband
infrastructure owned by a municipal entity, the authority shall permit the use of such funds
for the repayment of debt incurred by the municipal entity related to the development or
construction of the broadband infrastructure unless such use is prohibited by the federal
agency or other source providing the grant or award.